Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB828.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 367 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in Sections 1 and 2 of this Act:
(a) "Beneficiary" means any one (1) of the following who is solicited by or
signs a contract with a solar energy salesperson or a solar energy contractor
for a residential or commercial solar energy system:
1. An owner or leaseholder of residential or commercial property; or
2. An owner or lessee of a solar energy system;
(b) "Dealer fee" means an amount paid by a solar energy contractor or solar
energy salesperson to a lender in order to offer a beneficiary credit to
finance the purchase and installation of a solar energy system;
(c) "Electric utility" means:
1. A municipal electric utility established under KRS Chapter 96; or
2. An electric utility subject to KRS Chapter 278;
(d) "Major system components" means any inverters, module-level power
electronics, solar panels, racking systems, or battery energy storage
equipment included in the solar energy installation;
(e) "Solar array" means a mechanically and electrically integrated grouping of
modules with support structures, including any attached system components
such as inverters or direct current-to-direct current converters and attached
associated wiring;
(f) "Solar energy contractor" means a person that:
1. Designs, installs, repairs, replaces, or maintains solar energy systems;
and
2. Is licensed as an electrical contractor under KRS Chapter 227A;
Page 1 of 11
BR205300.100 - 2053 - XXXX 3/3/2026 3:16 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2053
(g) "Solar energy installation contract" means an agreement between a solar
energy contractor or solar energy salesperson and a beneficiary that
includes, in part, an agreement to install a residential or commercial solar
energy system for a total cost including labor and materials in excess of one
thousand dollars ($1,000);
(h) "Solar energy salesperson" means a person who solicits, negotiates, or
otherwise endeavors to procure a solar energy installation contract with a
beneficiary to install, repair, or replace residential or commercial solar
energy systems on behalf of a solar energy contractor or any other person;
(i) "Solar energy system" is any purchased, leased, or otherwise financed
system comprised of components, circuits, solar energy equipment, and
other equipment that in combination convert solar energy into electrical
energy; and
(j) "Solicit" means to make contact with a beneficiary for the purpose of
selling or installing residential or commercial solar energy systems
including but not limited to contact through any of the following methods:
1. Door-to-door contact;
2. Telephone contact or text messages;
3. Flyers left at a residence or commercial property;
4. Internet or social media advertisements; or
5. Other promotional advertisements that offer gifts, cash, or services if
the beneficiary contacts the solar energy contractor or solar energy
salesperson.
(2) (a) A person shall not advertise, offer to do work, submit a bid, engage in,
conduct, or carry on the business of designing, installing, repairing,
replacing, or maintaining residential or commercial solar energy systems
for a total cost including labor and materials in excess of one thousand
Page 2 of 11
BR205300.100 - 2053 - XXXX 3/3/2026 3:16 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2053
dollars ($1,000) unless he or she is licensed as an electrical contractor
under KRS Chapter 227A.
(b) Any solar energy installation contract executed between a beneficiary and
an unlicensed person shall be void and unenforceable.
(3) A solar energy installation contract shall:
(a) Be made in writing using the same language and terms as were principally
used in any sales presentations made to a beneficiary including any
material contract terms from print or digital marketing material given to the
beneficiary;
(b) Be given to the beneficiary at the time the beneficiary signs the contract;
and
(c) Contain the following:
1. An itemized list of work to be performed including any known or
anticipated electrical system upgrades or utility equipment upgrades
that are necessary for installation;
2. Any loan financing, leasing, or purchase agreement that is
incorporated directly into the contract, included as a separate
attachment or component of the contract, and conforming to all
federal and state consumer credit protection statutes, regulations, and
disclosure requirements, including terms and conditions, rents,
amount financed, finance charge, interest rates, total of payments,
annual percentage rate, the amortization schedule, late fees and
penalties, prepayment penalties, and information describing how the
loan financing is secured;
3. Disclosure of the exact amount paid, if any, by a solar energy
contractor or solar energy salesperson to any lender, lessor, or third-
party financing company in the form of a dealer fee, commission, or
Page 3 of 11
BR205300.100 - 2053 - XXXX 3/3/2026 3:16 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2053
other similar inducement to obtain financing, regardless of whether
financing is incorporated within the contract or in conjunction with a
third-party lender;
4. The total dollar amount of the contract;
5. The cost per watt calculated as the total contract amount, including
labor and materials, for installing the solar energy system divided by
the total direct current nameplate rating of the solar energy system;
6. A detailed payment schedule based on project completion milestones
that explains when payments are due, the beneficiary's right to cancel
the contract, and the cancellation fees due at each milestone in the
payment schedule;
7. The model and brand name of major system components to be
installed, and, in the case of a change in any major system
components throughout the duration of the contract, documentation
of those changes and the efficiency and warranty period of the new
major system components, and the agreement in writing by the
beneficiary to those changes;
8. The manufacturer's warranty period for each major system
component of the solar energy system;
9. The solar energy system's first year annual production projections in
kilowatt hours, which:
a. Shall be based on site-specific considerations of each solar
array, including location of the installation, orientation and
angle of the panels, and on-site shading factors;
b. Shall not exceed optimal inverter performance identified by the
manufacturer of the inverter equipment identified in the
contract; and
Page 4 of 11
BR205300.100 - 2053 - XXXX 3/3/2026 3:16 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2053
c. Shall be developed using nationally recognized, industry
standard tools and methodologies;
10. A provision detailing that if there is a change to the solar array that
reduces solar array production, the change order shall be submitted to
the beneficiary, and the beneficiary shall have a period of up to two
(2) weeks to cancel the contract;
11. The name, business address, email address, and phone number of the
primary solar energy salesperson, if different from the solar energy
contractor;
12. The name, business address, email address and license number of the
solar energy contractor;
13. A statement identifying whether all of the work will be performed by
employees of the solar energy contractor and, in the case of any part
of the work being subject to subcontracting by or assignment from the
solar energy contractor to another person, the circumstances by which
the subcontracting or assignment will occur and a disclosure of how
the solar energy contractor will monitor and ensure that the work is
completed in a safe, timely, and professional manner;
14. A notice of the beneficiary's right to cancel, which shall be initialed by
the beneficiary acknowledging that he or she has read and understood
the following applicable notice, in twelve (12) point font or larger and
including the following terms:
a. For a residential property, a right to cancel notice that is
consistent with requirements of KRS 367.430;
b. For a commercial property, a rescission rights notice that reads
as follows: "IF THIS AGREEMENT WAS SOLICITED TO
YOUR COMMERCIAL PROPERTY AND YOU DO NOT
Page 5 of 11
BR205300.100 - 2053 - XXXX 3/3/2026 3:16 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2053
WANT THE GOODS OR SERVICES, YOU MAY CANCEL
THIS AGREEMENT BY MAILING A NOTICE TO THE
SELLER. THE NOTICE MUST SAY THAT YOU DO NOT
WANT THE GOODS OR SERVICES AND MUST BE MAILED
BEFORE MIDNIGHT OF THE THIRD BUSINESS DAY
AFTER YOU SIGN THIS AGREEMENT. THE NOTICE
MUST BE MAILED TO:
..................................................
.................................................."
15. A statement of warranty that the solar energy contractor shall:
a. Install the solar energy system in compliance with:
i. The manufacturer instructions;
ii. The national electric code as enforced in the local
jurisdiction;
iii. Local building codes; and
iv. The applicable utility's interconnection standards; and
b. Correct or remedy any lack of compliance in the installation of
the system for at least one (1) year;
16. A statement fully and accurately describing the ability or inability of
the solar energy system to produce power during a grid outage,
including all applicable utility restrictions and conditions;
17. A statement authorizing the solar energy contractor to interact as
necessary with the beneficiary's electric utility on the beneficiary's
behalf to provide any required information to and obtain any
necessary approvals from the electric utility prior to, during, and
following construction and initial operation of the solar energy
system; and
Page 6 of 11
BR205300.100 - 2053 - XXXX 3/3/2026 3:16 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2053
18. A statement fully and accurately describing the solar energy
contractor's affiliation or lack of affiliation with the beneficiary's
electric utility.
(4) (a) If a beneficiary finances the purchase of the solar energy system with a
financed sales contract or leases the solar energy system, the financed sales
contract or lease shall state the beneficiary's:
1. Prior year mean electric bill;
2. Estimated monthly electric bill after the solar energy system begins
operation;
3. Monthly finance costs or rent after the solar energy system begins
operation; and
4. Total monthly bill for electricity and finance costs or for electricity
and rent after the solar energy system begins operation.
(b) The statement required in this subsection shall be initialed by the
beneficiary acknowledging that he or she has read and understood the
statement.
(5) If a beneficiary exercises any of the rescission rights as described in subsection
(3)(c) of this section, the solar energy contractor shall not enforce the terms of
the contract against the beneficiary, including any claims for labor or materials,
and shall terminate any security interest and release any statutory lien created
under the transaction within twenty (20) days of receiving written rescission of
the contract from the beneficiary. If a beneficiary exercises the rescission rights
via email or a certified letter postmarked within the three (3) day window to the
contacts listed in the solar energy installation contract, even if the solar energy
contractor or solar energy salesperson has not responded, the solar energy
contractor is prohibited from enforcing the terms of the contract and shall not
charge any cancellation fees.
Page 7 of 11
BR205300.100 - 2053 - XXXX 3/3/2026 3:16 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2053
(6) The solar energy contractor or beneficiary shall ensure that all required review
and approvals, as dictated by the appropriate net metering or qualifying facility
application process, are obtained from the beneficiary's electric utility prior to
energizing the solar energy system.
(7) A beneficiary is under no obligation to begin monthly payments on a financed
solar energy system until the beneficiary’s system has been granted permission to
operate by the applicable local or state inspection authority.
(8) If the scope of work in the solar energy installation contract includes roofing
work, the solar energy contractor shall provide the beneficiary separate invoices
for the roofing work, and the solar energy installation contract shall separately
itemize and identify the cost of any roofing tear-off and replacement.
(9) A person that purchases or is otherwise assigned a solar energy installation
contract is subject to all claims and defenses with respect to the contract that the
beneficiary could assert against the solar energy contractor. A person, firm,
partnership, corporation, or other entity which sells or otherwise assigns a solar
energy installation contract shall include a prominent notice of the potential
liability under this section.
(10) A person shall not solicit using any statement or representation with regard to the
costs, financing, terms, or conditions of purchase or installation of residential or
commercial solar energy systems that is deceptive.
(11) A solar energy contractor or solar energy salesperson who fails to substantially
comply with the requirements of this chapter is liable to the beneficiary for any
actual damages sustained by the beneficiary as a result of the failure. This
section does not limit any other cause of action or remedy available under KRS
Chapter 367.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 367 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
Page 8 of 11
BR205300.100 - 2053 - XXXX 3/3/2026 3:16 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2053
(1) Any person may maintain an action to enjoin the continuing of any act in
violation of Section 1 of this Act, and if injured may also maintain an action for
the recovery of damages.
(2) If the court finds based on evidence presented by the plaintiff that the defendant
is violating or has violated Section 1 of this Act, the court shall enjoin the
defendant from continuing the violations.
(3) Actual economic damages shall not be required to be alleged or proved by the
plaintiff in order for the court to enjoin violations.
(4) In addition to injunctive relief and any other relief the plaintiff may be entitled to
under this section:
(a) The plaintiff shall be entitled to recover from the defendant two (2) times
the amount of any actual economic damages sustained; and
(b) The court may award the plaintiff reasonable attorney's fees and costs.
(5) In addition to the remedies provided under this section, all remedies, powers, and
duties provided to the Attorney General under KRS 367.110 to 367.300, and the
penalties provided in KRS 367.990, any other applicable remedies, powers, and
duties provided under applicable law shall apply with equal force and effect to
any act declared unlawful in Section 1 of this Act.
(6) The Attorney General may recover a civil penalty of five thousand dollars
($5,000) per violation against any person who violates Section 1 of this Act.
(7) An electric utility shall not be held liable for any violation of Section 1 of this Act
unless it is acting in the capacity of a solar energy contractor or solar energy
salesperson.
(8) This section shall not prohibit the Attorney General or any other person from
pursuing the recovery of damages, penalties, restitution, disgorgement, or
injunctive relief afforded elsewhere under the law.
Section 3. KRS 227.480 is amended to read as follows:
Page 9 of 11
BR205300.100 - 2053 - XXXX 3/3/2026 3:16 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2053
(1) (a) A city, county, urban-county government, charter county, or consolidated
local government or the state shall, according to the Uniform State Building
Code as it pertains to the plan review and inspection responsibilities of local
governments or the state, require any person to obtain a permit before
commencing construction, alteration, or repairs of any electrical system.
(b) The city, county, urban-county government, charter county, or consolidated
local government or the state shall require all inspections that are deemed
necessary by the department for the safety of life and property. The
department shall promulgate administrative regulations to describe the
circumstances where inspections are required.
(2) A city, county, urban-county government, charter county, or consolidated local
government or the state shall not issue a permit unless the applicant submits proof
of being licensed as an electrical contractor under KRS Chapter 227A or of acting
on behalf of a licensed electrical contractor. However, the provisions of this
subsection shall not apply to:
(a) A homeowner or farmer who does construction, alteration, or repairs of any
electrical system on his or her own premises or any other person exempt from
licensing under KRS 227A.030 or 227A.150;
(b) Electrical work performed by the Commonwealth of Kentucky, a city, county,
urban-county government, charter county, or consolidated local government,
or any subdivision thereof;
(c) A company with a recently deceased licensed electrical contractor, which
shall be granted an interim period of up to one hundred eighty (180)
continuous calendar days by the city, county, urban-county government,
charter county, consolidated local government, or state to allow the company
to utilize the license of the deceased electrical contractor if:
1. The company effectuates and documents all necessary bonding and
Page 10 of 11
BR205300.100 - 2053 - XXXX 3/3/2026 3:16 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2053
insurance policies required by KRS Chapter 227A; and
2. Ensures that the bonding and insurance policies remain in effect for the
entirety of the interim period of time extended; or
(d) A disaster response business as defined in KRS 141.010.
(3) A city, county, urban-county government, charter county, or consolidated local
government shall appoint and may fix the compensation of city, county, urban-
county government, charter county, or consolidated local government electrical
inspectors, and may by ordinance fix reasonable fees and establish other
requirements for the conduct of electrical inspections within its boundaries. All
electrical inspectors shall be certified under KRS 227.489.
(4) Reasonable standards for the construction, alteration, and repair of any electrical
system shall be those adopted in the Uniform State Building Code, as promulgated
by the department, and shall have as a minimum standard the requirements of the
National Electrical Code, which may include Kentucky amendments. These
standards shall be used by the electrical inspector in making his or her inspections.
(5) Local standards and fees for inspection of any solar energy system, as defined in
Section 1 of this Act, shall be applied in a nondiscriminatory manner consistent
with the treatment of comparable facilities.
Page 11 of 11
BR205300.100 - 2053 - XXXX 3/3/2026 3:16 PM Jacketed